 And we've gotten rid of the diabetes.
 As stated cautiously by Dr Ehud Ur,
 Like other experts, he's sceptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, pointing out that these results are not relevant to people who are already suffering from type 1 diabetes.
 The permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy, Sara Danius,
 Now, come, we're not doing anything.
 In the previous episode,
 He said he built a Wi-Fi Bell.
 Siminoff has stated that sales increased after his appearance in 2013 on an episode of Shark Tank, in which the show's panel of investors refused to finance the startup.
 Siminoff appeared on the commercial television network QVC at the end of 2017.
 Ring has also reached a transactive agreement with the competing security company, ADT Corporation.
 So it seems like there's a vaccine in the works,
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, initially showed promise in the field, but formal studies have revealed an efficacy lower than that hoped for in preventing deaths.
 In the study, PALM,
 The USA Gymnastics applauds the letter from the U S. Olympic Committee and recognizes the absolute necessity for the Olympic community to work together to create a safe environment for all of its athletes.
 We agree with the USOC,
 The USA Gymnastics has promoted an independent investigation to understand how it is that an abuse of the dimensions described with such courage by those who have managed to survive Larry Nassar has remained hidden for so long, and is disposed to implement any necessary or appropriate change.
 USA Gymnastics and the U S . Olympic Committee have the same goal,
 In the course of the nineteen sixty s,
 In the course of the 1976 elections, he advised Carter on foreign policy, and then served as National Security Advisor from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 In qualità di membro dell'NSA, ha collaborato con Carter alla gestione diplomatica degli affari internazionali, tra cui gli Accordi di Camp David del 1978, la normalizzazione dei rapporti tra Cina e Stati Uniti alla fine degli anni '70, la rivoluzione iraniana (che ha portato alla crisi degli ostaggi in Iran nel 1979) e l'invasione sovietica dell'Afghanistan nel 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, has been nominated in all the major categories.
 Gosling and the stone have had the nomination for best actor and best actress respectively.
 The other nominations include best film, best director, best photography, best costume, best editing, best original score, best set design, best sound editing, best sound mixing, and best original screenplay.
 Two pieces of the film, Audition and City of Stars, have been nominated for best original song.
 On Sunday evening,
 The announcement came after a phone call between Trump and Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey, the statement says, would also take over the custody of the ISIS fighters who are being held in detention camps in Syria.
 This not only confirms that some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that's already widely accepted, but it provides greater detail about the feathers, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Secondly, as the scientists say,
 The discovery also allows us to obtain detailed information about the evolution of feathers in birds.
 The Italian text reads,
 The structure of the feathers makes one think that it was not used for flight, but rather for regulating the temperature or for courtship.
 Second, according to the researchers,
 A car bomb exploded yesterday morning at the headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two officers and injuring more than twenty people.
 Among the dead,
 The police have reported that the suspect responsible for the attack is a suspected Daesh militant.
 Hanno scoperto that the working of the sun is based on the same principles as those of the other stars.
 The luminosity is used together with the rotation to define the Rossby number of a Star, which is related to the flow of plasma.
 The lower the Rossby number,
 During his voyage, Iwasaki got into trouble on several occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet,
 The standard 802.11n can operate in both the 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz bands.
 I mean, if the base station has dual radios,
 The speeds of 802.11n are considerably higher than those of the previous versions, with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, married with two grown children,
 During the trial, Miller said,
 We will strive to cut carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by a significant margin by 2020, compared with the levels of 2005.
 He has not set a precise value on the reduction,
 He has invited the developing world to, quote,
 But also added that they should not be forced to assume obligations beyond their stage of development,
 The group of study on Iraq has presented its report today at 12.00 GMT.
 No one can guarantee that any action in Iraq at this point will stop the sectarian violence, the growing violence, or a slide towards chaos.
 The report begins with a call for an open debate and a consensus in the United States about policy in the Middle East.
 The report is strongly critical of almost all aspects of the current policy of the executive towards Iraq, and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 The first of his 78 recommendations is to launch a new diplomatic initiative by the end of this year to protect Iraq's borders from hostile actions and to resume diplomatic relations with its neighbours.
 The Argentinean senator and first lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for the Presidency last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometres from Buenos Aires.
 The Kirchner chose the Argentine theater to announce her intention of running for the Presidency, the same place from which in 2005 she had given the start to her electoral campaign for the Senate as a member of the delegation of the province of Buenos Aires.
 The discussion was sparked by controversy over spending and rebuilding in the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives, in jest, have labeled as the Bush New Deal for New Orleans.
 The liberal criticism of the rebuilding effort has focused on the awarding of rebuilding contracts to insiders in Washington.
 Over four million people have come to Rome to take part in the funeral.
 The people present were so numerous that it was not possible for all to have access to the funeral in St . Peter's square.
 At various points in Rome,
 Similar installations have been made in many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, especially in Poland, and a great number of people have watched the event through them.
 The historians criticize the FBI's past policies,
 The initiative against obscenity was funded by Congress starting in fiscal year 2005, with the specific request to the FBI to assign 10 agents to pornography for adults.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest individual score of the innings with 70 runs in just 41 balls, scoring 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, played well and scored in collaboration one hundred runs.
 And from that moment until the end of the innings,
 On the morning of November sixteenth,
 And he was received by the vice prime minister of Singapore,
 After a week of midterm election defeats,
 After a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton in the PMO, Prime Minister Stephen Harper has agreed to have the government's Clean Air Act reviewed by a committee of all parties in preparation for a second reading.
 In the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested some amendments to the Conservative Party's environmental bill, urging a thorough and complete rewrite.
 The Federal Government has intervened,
 The Prime Minister, John Howard,
 Secondly, the latest bulletin,
 There have been no reported damage to people or property in Tonga, however, there has been a temporary loss of power and this, according to reports, has prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning from the PTWC.
 Fourteen Hawaiian schools located near the coasts were closed all day Wednesday,
 The announcement was welcomed by President George W . Bush.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for Bush, called the North Korean promise a "fundamental step towards the goal of denuclearizing the Korean peninsula.
 Today, the tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical Cyclone Jerry,
 Secondly,
 Secondly,
 The Ninth Ward, where Hurricane Katrina had caused flooding up to 20 feet,
 The water traced a section of the embankment that was one hundred feet wide.
 The administrator of Commons, Adam Cuerden,
 In substance, Wales lied to us from the beginning.
 Following the discomfort of the community,
 The work done was mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the actual surveys of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect sought by the team was to be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of this Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky way.
 So as the moon exerts a force of attraction on the earth that generates the tides,
 Scientists have been able to deduce that the effects of dark matter on other dark matter are the same as the effects of normal matter on normal matter.
 But this theory,
 The television reports show the white smoke coming out of the plant.
 The local authorities are alerting people who live near the power plant to stay in their homes, to turn off their air conditioners, and not to drink the water from the tap.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency,
 The hypothesis of the authorities is that this indicates a rupture and a consequent loss of the uranium fuel containers at the site.
 Dr Tony Moll has identified extensively drug resistant tuberculosis,
 Secondly,
 Secondly,
 Over the course of a year,
 And yet, the percentage of XDR-TB in the whole group of people who are infected with TB seems to be still low,
 The collision,
 Scientists say the collision caused an explosion.
 They're still trying to determine the size of the impact and what the consequences will be.
 The U S . strategic command,
 The result of the analysis of the tracings will be published on a public Website.
 The authorities in Ohio report that a doctor who worked at the children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated murder following the discovery of his mother's dead body in the trunk of her car on Wednesday.
 The doctor, Malar Balasubramanian,
 He directed the agents toward his old black Intrigue, which was parked 500 feet away.
 Here, wrapped in dirty blood-stained sheets,
 Secondly,
 The first cases of the season were reported at the end of July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease,
 The Indian government, pushed by the epidemic, has adopted some measures like deploying people to catch pigs in the most affected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government has also promised several million vials of vaccine against encephalitis,
 The plans for the delivery of vaccines in the historically most affected areas have been delayed this year because of a lack of funds and because they have been given a low priority in relation to other diseases.
 Three years after his transfer to Sweden in 1956, Słania began working for the Swedish postal service, becoming its chief engraver.
 He has created more than 1,000 stamps,
 The quality and detail of his work are so recognized that it has become one of the very few "household names" among philatelists. Some have even specialized in collecting only his work.
 In 2000, he obtained his millennium stamp, the magnificent "Great Deeds by Swedish Kings" by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, which is listed in the Guinness of records.
 His work also included the engraving of many countries' banknotes.
 Gibson, after the incident, was rushed to the hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The truck driver, who is 64,
 The vehicle involved was removed from the scene of the incident the same day, around 12:00 GMT.
 A person who worked in a car repair shop near the scene of the accident said,
 They all returned to the place where the incident had occurred.
 The other topics on the agenda in Bali include saving the world's last remaining forests and sharing technologies to support the growth of developing nations in a less polluting way.
 The UN also hopes to create a fund to help countries hit by global warming to cope with its impacts.
 Money could be used to build houses that are resistant to flooding,
 The Fluke has written that the efforts of some to dissuade women from speaking openly about women's health have not succeeded.
 It has come to this conclusion thanks to the multitude of positive comments and encouragement received from both men and women who are pushing for the recognition of contraceptive drugs as a medical necessity.
 At the end of the fighting, once the wounded had been taken to the hospital, about forty of the remaining detainees remained in the square, refusing to return to their cells.
 The negotiators have tried to resolve the situation,
 Between 22:00 and 23:00 MDT, the inmates started a fire in the courtyard.
 Soon after, agents in antisommossa uniforms entered the courtyard and cornered the detainees, using tear gas.
 At the end, the firefighters managed to control the fire at 23:35.
 Following the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal flooding that spread sediments along the river course has ceased.
 This sediment was fundamental in the creation of both beaches and sandbars that became habitats for wildlife.
 Because of this, two species of fish have become extinct, and two others are at risk of becoming extinct, including the Cavedano Gobbo.
 Even if the flooding only raises the water level by a few metres,
 And according to the Jakarta geophysics agency,
 Despite the fact that there was no tsunami,
 Despite the fact that Winfrey has given the farewell in tears, she has assured her fans that she will return.
 And here's the new one.
 The final results of the Namibian Presidential and Parliamentary elections have seen the re-election of the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, who has won a significant majority.
 Even in the parliamentary elections, the majority remains in the hands of the ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation.
 The coalition and Afghan troops have reached the area to secure the place, then the support of other coalition aircraft has arrived.
 The accident happened in high mountain and it is believed to have been caused by enemy fire.
 The search for the site of the accident is hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 The medical charity, Medecins Sans Frontieres,
 The spokesperson for Medics without borders, Richard Veerman, said,
 Today at 10:00 the weather was magnificent when the matches began and, despite a shower of rain at midday which lasted only a few minutes, it was a perfect day for Rugby Sevens.
 The Sudafrica, first seed of the tournament, started with the right foot, winning an easy victory against Zambia, fifth seed, by 26 to 0.
 Despite looking rather rusty in the opening game against the Southern sisters, South Africa has steadily improved throughout the tournament.
 But the defense was disciplined,
 The tree, according to officials of the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum, is infested with a fungus and poses a public health risk because, they say, it was in imminent danger of falling.
 It was due to be demolished on Tuesday,
 The entrances to the caves, called the seven sisters, have all a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 The Infrared images show thermal oscillations between day and night, which is a proof that they are probably caves.
 And they're colder in the daytime than the surrounding surface.
 Italian Text: And the reason for that is,
 In France, the vote is traditionally a low-tech affair.
 After the verification of his identity by the officials, the elector deposits the ballot in the urn and signs the register of voters.
 The French electoral law codifies the procedures in a rather rigorous way.
 From 1988 onwards, the ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can testify that at the beginning of the vote no ballot boxes are present and that no others are added to those of the voters, duly counted and authorized.
 The candidates may send representatives to assist in every phase of the process.
 The Eee PC from ASUS, previously launched worldwide for its low-cost and functionality, has become a controversial topic at the IT Month event in Taipei 2007.
 But the market for laptop computers will be greatly modified and different after the assignment of the Taiwan Sustainable Award in 2007 to ASUS by the executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The Website of the station defines the program as,
 Initially, the show aired only on the historic Toginet radio,
 TogiNet has established AstroNet Radio as a consociated station at the end of 2015.
 Originally, the show used Non-Professional voice actors from the East of Texas.
 Diffuse razzie would be continuing during the night, given the absence of the agents of the forces of order on the streets of Biškek.
 Secondly, according to one witness,
 Vari residenti of Biškek have criticized the protesters of the South for the illegal actions they have carried out.
 South Africa won against the All Blacks in the Rugby Tri-Nations match played at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg.
 The final score was one point to twenty.
 For the Springboks, this was the end of a run of five consecutive losses.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks,
 The final match of the tournament,
 Monday a slight earthquake hit Western Montana at 22:08.
 The United States Geological Survey and its National earthquake information center have not received any immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was located about 20 kilometers north-north-east of Dillon and about 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 It has been confirmed that the H5N1 strain of avian influenza, which is lethal to humans, has infected a wild duck found dead on Monday in a marsh near Lyon.
 The United States,
 The cases in Croatia and Denmark have not been confirmed.
 Chambers had made God a party to his crimes.
 Secondo Chambers, an Agnostic, his legal cause is superficial and anyone can be sued by anyone.
 The story presented by Camille Saint-Saens at the French opera,
 This means that during the performance the actors smoke pipes and urge the audience to join them.
 Fourth, fifth and sixth place.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum but had harsh words for Romney, for whom negative ads against Gingrich had been aired in Iowa.
 I'm going to Texas to see if I can win.
 Bachmann, who won the straw poll in Iowa,
 The photographer was rushed to Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 Even though I wasn't there,
 Da quanto appreso dal sito web di notizie di intrattenimento TMZ, the photographer stopped his vehicle from the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to photograph the California highway patrol officer who was directing traffic to a stop, then he crossed the street and continued, forcing the California highway patrol officer who was directing traffic to a stop to turn back two times.
 Secondly,
 With only eighteen medals available every day, a good number of countries just didn't make it onto the podium.
 And the Netherlands with Anna Jochemsen,
 The Italian Federico Liberatore has obtained the eleventh place in the men's Super-G, while the Czech opponent Oldrich Jelinek has obtained the sixteenth place in the same speciality.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez has finished in fifteenth place in the men's Super-G. In the men's Super-G standing, the New Zealander Adam Hall has finished ninth.
 The Polish blind skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished thirteenth in the Super-G.
 The UN peacekeeping forces who arrived in Haiti after the earthquake of 2010 are believed to have been responsible for the spread of the disease, which began near the soldiers' camp.
 Second, the inadequate sanitation of the United Nations camp has caused bacterial contamination of the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's main waterways.
 Before the arrival of the troops,
 Independent studies have cited the Nepalese UN peacekeeping forces as the likely source of the disease.
 Danielle Lantagne,
 The patient is in stable condition.
 The patient had gone to Nigeria,
 The hospital followed the protocol for infection control, including isolating the patient to prevent others from becoming infected.
 Before the Simpsons,
 In the eighty s,
 In 1989, he participated in the creation of the Simpsons alongside Brooks and Groening, and he curated the selection of the show's first team of writers.
 But he's kept the title of executive producer.
 In a first moment,
 Secondly, the reports received subsequently,
 The first reports say the plane was diverted again to Afghanistan after it was denied emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air incidents are common in Iran, whose fleet is now obsolete and poorly maintained, both from a civilian and military point of view.
 They couldn't buy new planes.
 At the beginning of this week, three people were killed and three others injured following an incident with a police helicopter.
 Last month Iran experienced the worst air disaster in years.
 Another plane,
 The subsequent concerts of the tour have been canceled by Aerosmith.
 The band had to cancel the tour.
 The band has canceled the remainder of their tour.
 Murray ha perso the first set in the tie-break, after the players had maintained each the service in the set.
 Del Potro had an early break in the second set, which he also won in a tie-break after the score of 6-6.
 At this point, Del Potro was undergoing a shoulder treatment, but he managed to return to the game.
 The beginning of the program was at 20:30 local time.
 Some famous singers from all over the country have offered bhajan, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakkha Singh, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal, also presented the bhajan Chhappan Bhog.
 And then Lakkha Singh,
 They were served a Baba Shyam 108 Chhappan Bhog.
 Lakkha Singh has also presented the bhajan for the chhappan bhog.
 And the new Nintendo Revolution Controller.
 In a similar way to the TV remote control,
 This will allow players to control actions and movements within the game by moving the device in the air.
 Soon after the start, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and ended his race.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, was in the lead for most of the race, but his race ended immediately after his pit stop, probably because of the incorrect mounting of the right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher has reached the finish line behind Alonso, because of a damage to the suspension that occurred in one of the duels in which he was involved during the race.
 In a transcript of the press conference,
 Every time we've rehearsed,
 After about 3 minutes from the launch,
 However, it is not believed that they caused any damage to the shuttle.
 The director of NASA's space shuttle program,
 About a minute after the wind started,
 I lost my sister and her friend,
 The nuclear power plant of Kashiwazaki Kariwa,
 The Hokuriku Electric Power Co. has reported no damage due to the earthquake, and has also reported that reactors 1 and 2 at the Shika nuclear power plant have been shut down.
 Secondly, as reported,
 Some roads are damaged,
 Exploded a bomb.
 In the space of two hours,
 Secondo alcuni resoconti,
 In the samples of urine from domestic animals that had eaten contaminated pet food,
 The researchers at the University have stated that the two compounds react with each other, forming crystals that can obstruct the functioning of the kidneys.
 The researchers found the formation of crystals in the urine of cats, due to the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 In comparison by infrared spectroscopy,
 But I don't know if you're aware of this,
 Nevertheless, 80% of our goods have been taxed with duties in the countries of Central America.
 I mean, it just didn't make any sense.
 All I say to the people is treat us as we treat you.
 The governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger,
 The law requires that violent Video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a warning that says, quote,
 This morning the head of the public prosecution, Kier Starmer QC,
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the government by Ed Davey MP. Norman Lamb MP is expected to take over the role of Minister for Business left vacant by Davey.
 The trial of Huhne and Pryce is set for the 16th of February.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden,
 Edgar Veguilla has reported injuries to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider will have to undergo a surgical reconstruction of his face.
 The Uka's weapon did not explode when it was aimed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has constant pain, is blind in one eye, has a section of his skull missing, and his face has been reconstructed in titanium.
 Schneider testified via Videoconferencing from a U S . Air Force base in his home country.
 In addition to the Wednesday event, the Carpanedo participated in two single races of the Championships.
 The first in the slalom, where at the first descent he made a DNF. Another 36 competitors out of 116 in the same race did not finish.
 The other race she participated in, the slalom,
 Four of the female skiers in the women's team failed to finish their runs, and 45 of the 117 participants in the giant slalom did not finish the race.
 The Madhya Pradesh police have recovered the laptop and the mobile phone that were stolen.
 The Italian police have arrested five men.
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Secondo the superintendent of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared in court with their faces covered.
 None of the three people who were in the house at the time of the car crash were injured.
 Despite this, the driver was seriously injured to the head.
 The road in which the accident happened was temporarily closed, while the emergency services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Since that moment, Adekoya has been in the custody of the Edinburgh sheriff with the charge of having killed his own son.
 But any testimony given by an eyewitness could be tainted,
 But in Scotland,
 Secondly,
 The Crown Office, which has overall responsibility for prosecutions, has told journalists it will not be making any further comment until the formal charge is made.
 Secondly, as to the borders,
 And the other topics that are being discussed include the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the question of the Jordan Valley.
 Once the agreement is signed, Israel demands a constant military presence in the valley, while the Palestinian authority agrees to abandon such presence only for five years.
 The shooters within the experimental program for the control of noxious animals were to be closely supervised by the rangers,
 Within the framework of the hunting program of the Sporting Shooters Association, the NPWS in collaboration with the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 Secondo Mick O'Flynn,
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council,
 It's the fifth provisional electoral Council in four years.
 Last month, a Presidential Commission proposed a package of measures aimed at pushing the country towards new elections, including the resignation of the previous CEP.
 The Commission has constituted the response of Martelly to the widespread protests, which began in October, that challenge the regime.
 The occasional violent protests have been triggered by the failure to hold elections, some of which were scheduled as early as 2011.
 There have been about 60 cases of iPods overheating,
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry,
 The week before, the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry announced that it had been informed by Apple of another 34 incidents related to overheating, which the company called non-serious.
 In his reply, the Ministry called the report's delay,
 The earthquake was felt in Guam,
 Secondly,
 And also the Pacific Tsunami warning center has reported that there are no tsunami warnings in effect.
 A Manila, capital of the Philippines, a former Filipino policeman has taken hostage some Hong Kong tourists after hijacking their bus.
 With his M16 Rolando Mendoza opened fire on the tourists.
 At least six have been killed.
 Among the hostages were children and the elderly.
 The photographers then replaced an elderly lady who needed to use the bathroom.
 Liggins has followed in his father's footsteps and has taken up the career of a doctor.
 After training as an obstetrician,
 In his spare time,
 His research showed that giving a hormone to the mother would speed up the maturation of the lungs in the unborn child.
 The investigators have recovered two black boxes.
 Even his wrestling partners wanted to pay tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer has stated,
 And I'm like,
 Secondly, the poll conducted before the Federal election in 2010, showed that the number of people opposed to Australia becoming a Republic had increased by 8% since the 2008 poll.
 In the course of the 2010 Federal election campaign, the then acting Prime Minister, Julia Gillard, stated that she believed that Australia should become a Republic at the end of Elizabeth II's reign.
 This opinion is shared by 34% of the participants in the poll, according to which Queen Elizabeth II should be the last monarch of Australia.
 At the other end of the survey,
 The Olympic gold medalist was supposed to compete in the 100 and 200-meter freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth Games, but she has been plagued by several injuries that have led to doubts about her physical condition.
 He couldn't take the medication he needed to overcome the pain because they're banned from the games.
 On January 25,
 The discovery was verified by several people through the use of various hardware and software at the beginning of February, and it was announced Tuesday.
 Comets could have been one of the sources that led to the earth's water and organic matter,
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form,
 Cuomo, 53, has been governor since the beginning of this year.
 Secondly,
 If he runs for President in 2016.
 Second, the NextGen system would allow planes to cover shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, thereby reducing carbon dioxide emissions.
 The system employs satellite technology instead of the obsolete ground-based radar, allowing air traffic controllers to locate aircraft with greater precision and to provide pilots with more accurate information.
 And the trains are not stopping at Wembley.
 The fears linked to the absence of transportation have made it possible to dispute the match obligatorily behind closed doors, without the support of the team's fans.
 Secondo uno studio published on Thursday in the Journal Science,
 Secondo i ricercatori dell'Università di Princeton, Stati Uniti, and the University of Uppsala, Sweden, the new species evolved in just two generations, although it was thought that the time necessary for this process was much greater,
 Gold can be worked into any shape.
 It may be drawn into a thin wire,
 It can be made very thin and attached to other metals.
 Using the juice of the red cabbage,
 The juice of the cabbage changes color based on how acidic or basic it is.
 The pH level of a substance is given by the amount of hydrogen ions present.
 With hydrogen ions,
 Mix the two powders together,
 Um between the umidity on your hands and the outer layers,
 Almost all the houses in the cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had a bathroom with running water,
 In Greece, in the houses of the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini,
 In the Roman civilization,
 To call someone far away,
 The satellite receives the signal and then it sends it back almost instantly.
 The launch of the satellite into space was made with a rocket. Scientists use space telescopes because the atmosphere of the earth distorts in part the light and the view.
 It is necessary to have a rocket that is more than one hundred feet tall.
 Among the various advantages that it has brought us,
 Thanks to his invention,
 Below them are other medium-sized cats that feed on medium-sized prey, ranging from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 There are many small felines,
 The concept of niche is the secret of their success,
 The lions are the most social of the cats,
 The males are solitary,
 Usually the women are closely related,
 The pack of lions acts in a manner very similar to the pack of wolves or dogs, whose behavior is in fact surprisingly analogous to that of the lions,
 A complete athlete, the tiger is able to climb,
 The tiger belongs to the same family as the lion, the Leopard, and the Jaguar.
 But the roar of the tiger is not so loud as that of the lion.
 If possible, they hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds, and almost all the prey they capture is much smaller than they are.
 Scientists believe that ocelots follow and find their prey by smelling the ground where they have been.
 In addition to being able to see in the dark,
 When a small group of living beings,
 And so,
 The original population has not changed at all.
 And as the new population adapts to its new environment,
 At a certain point, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will appear so different to each other that they can no longer be defined as belonging to the same species.
 This process, which consists in the formation of new species, is called speciation.
 Plants produce oxygen, which is breathed in by humans, and absorb the carbon dioxide exhaled by humans.
 Plants make their own food with the sun's help.
 We build our houses from plants,
 And it was a super predator.
 More than seventy sharp teeth,
 It is possible that he had a forked tongue.
 And he would even attack anything that entered the water,
 Although most of their foods would seem familiar,
 Another difference was that while the poor and women ate sitting on chairs, the rich men loved to banquet together while reclining on couches.
 But the Romans,
 For example, they had no maize, tomatoes, potatoes, or cacao, and none of the ancient Romans had ever tasted a turkey.
 For every divinity had its temple,
 And the priests,
 Every temple had an open courtyard,
 Sometimes, they were built in the form of a pyramid,
 The top of the tower was a shrine dedicated to the god.
 Thanks to the mild climate that characterizes the Middle East, the house was not of fundamental importance.
 For the most part,
 The women cooked in the courtyard, while the shops were simple open stalls that faced the street.
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests,
 In the Norse Sagas,
 But, apart from that,
 Pur essendo tutti Paesi scandinavi, i popoli, i re, le usanze e la storia di Danimarca, Svezia, Norvegia e Islanda avevano caratteristiche molto diverse.
 If you've seen the movie, the Da Vinci code,
 However, this is false.
 On the back of the Declaration of independence,
 At the beginning of its existence,
 Probably, then, the annotation was only added as a label.
 The landing of the D-Day and the ensuing fights had brought the North of France to liberation, but the South was still occupied.
 It was governed by the Vichy regime,
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France.
 The American and French armies had liberated the South of France in just two weeks,
 By civilization, we mean a specific culture, shared by a significantly large group of people who live and work in a collaborative way, forming a society.
 The word civilization derives from the Latin word civilis, which means civil, or citizen, and the word civitas, which means city or city-state.
 The city-states are the first realities to anticipate the idea of nation.
 Minor cultures often disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces,
 During the war of independence, the thirteen States formed for the first time a weak central government, and the Congress was the only component, according to the statute of the Confederation.
 Given the absence of an executive or judiciary at the national level,
 He had no authority to bypass the laws.
 But the unanimous consent of all the states was required to amend the articles.
 The Italian national football team is, along with the German national football team, the second most successful national football team in the world, and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Among the most popular sports,
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions,
 Almost 7,000 Islands make up Japan,
 From a geographical point of view, Japan is referred to as an archipelago,
 Taiwan was born in the fifteenth century, when European sailors who were passing by registered the name of the island with the name of Ilha Formosa, or the wonderful island.
 The Dutch East India company established a base in the South-Western part of Taiwan in 1624, giving rise to a transformation of the aboriginal cereal production systems and the introduction of Chinese labourers to work in its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the Western and Northern coastal areas of Taiwan came under the control of the Qing dynasty forces.
 After being defeated in the first Sino-Japanese war,
 Machu Picchu comprises three primary structures, and notably the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun, and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 A large part of the Peripheral buildings has been rebuilt to give tourists a more accurate idea of their original appearance.
 In 1976, thirty percent of the site of Machu Picchu had been recovered, but the restoration works are still ongoing.
 The most common format in the world for still photography,
 And, more importantly,
 Strangely, the height of the 35 mm format is 24 mm, and its width is 36 mm.
 The proportions of this format,
 The proportions of many of the common formats,
 The much-abused and often derided rule of thirds is a simple guideline that creates dynamism while maintaining a measure of order within a composition.
 Secondly, the most effective place to position the main subject corresponds to the intersection of the lines that divide the image into thirds, both vertically and horizontally.
 In this phase of European history, the Catholic Church,
 Religion had acted as a glue between the European States for over a thousand years,
 His omnipresent power has influenced everyone, from the King to the common citizen.
 One of the foundations of Christianity is that wealth must serve to relieve suffering and poverty, and that the monetary reserves of the church exist precisely for this reason.
 And this convergence of power and money has led many to question whether this principle has been respected.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities,
 The strategy proved effective.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent the access of any vessel to entire sections of the ocean, putting even neutral ships at risk.
 But this tactic had elicited a limited response.
 In the nineteen twenty s,
 After having assisted at the horrors and atrocities of the first World War,
 In 1884, Tesla accepted a job offer at the Edison company in New York City,
 He arrived in the United States with four cents in his pocket, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 In the ancient China,
 An even more turbulent period followed,
 In these periods, between many nobles in lotta per il trono si accesero guerre feroci.
 The period of the Three Kingdoms was one of the most violent in the history of ancient China.
 Among the social and political effects,
 In addition, after the Revolution,
 The same holds true for the military,
 The French Revolution was an inspiration even to many other oppressed workers of various countries to begin their own revolution.
 And he would go there to pray.
 The cave, which has survived the passing of time, offers in itself a very clear image of Muhammad's spirituality.
 The cave rests on the summit of one of the mountains north of Mecca,
 Even if you know it's there.
 And nothing else.
 Among the seven wonders of the world, the great pyramid of Giza is the only one that has come down to us in a state of preservation.
 Built by the Egyptians in the third century B.C., the great pyramid is one of the great pyramidal structures built in honor of the dead Pharaoh.
 The Giza plateau, or Giza Necropolis,
 And many of the lesser pyramids,
 The indication arcata in su,
 And the other way around.
 A rising arc,
 You can add your own personalized indications with a pencil, but keep in mind that the marks you find printed have a musical value, so in line of mass they should be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a crowd of market women forced King Louis XVI, in a state of terror, to leave Versailles and return to Paris, together with his wife, Marie Antoinette, their two small children, Marie-Thérèse, who was eleven years old, and Louis-Charles, who was four, and with his sister, Elizabeth.
 With a coach they returned to Paris,
 The crowd forced the King and the queen to keep the windows of their carriage wide open.
 At a certain point, someone in the crowd showed the terrified queen the head of a Royal guard who had been killed at Versailles.
 The expenses of the war,
 They were forced to pay taxes to the colonial regime of the United States to cover a good part of the expenses and the interest on the bonds oscillated in the name of the Philippine government through the Wall Street banks.
 And the profits were huge.
 To understand the Templars,
 The period in which the events took place is commonly called the early Middle Ages, the period of European history that covers the eleventh, twelfth, and thirteenth centuries.
 The full Middle Ages were preceded by the early Middle Ages,
 Determinism is a term that includes in practice a wide range of ideas, from technological innovation or the technological imperative, to the narrow sense in which it is used, namely, that the destiny of man is moved by a logos, a law, underlying it, associated with scientific laws and their realization in technology.
 One is that the development of technology itself follows a course that goes far beyond political and cultural influence,
 For example, we can say that the automobile necessarily entails the development of the road network.
 However, a national road network for only a few cars is not economically sustainable, therefore new methods of production are being developed to reduce the costs related to car ownership.
 The possession of mass of automobiles also leads to a greater percentage of accidents on the roads, and consequently the invention of new techniques of first aid for the care of injured persons.
 The romanticism was characterized by a consistent component of cultural determinism,
 In the framework of romanticism, geography has conditioned individuals, and over time, usages, customs, and culture have arisen that, being in harmony with the context of society, have proven more effective than laws imposed arbitrarily.
 Similarly to Paris,
 His notoriety as a center of luxury began around the year 400 and lasted until about the year 1100.
 During the twelfth century, its prestige declined,
 At this point, the title of fashion capital passed from Constantinople to Paris.
 The highest point of the Gothic style was reached in the period between the tenth and eleventh centuries,
 Initially, clothing was influenced by Byzantine culture.
 But the slowness of communication makes it so that the diffusion of styles in the West may be delayed by 25 to 30 years.
 At the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style.
 Agriculture is defined as subsistence when it is practiced solely to produce the sufficient to satisfy the food needs of the farmer and his family.
 Agriculture of subsistence is a simple system, usually of the biological type, which uses seeds originally of the region and which rotates crops or uses other relatively simple techniques to get the maximum from the harvest.
 Historically,
 Under-culture,
 Under-culture distinguishes itself based on age, ethnicity, class, position, and or sex of its members.
 The characteristics that define a subculture can be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Often, members of a subculture indicate their membership through a peculiar and symbolic use of style, which includes modes, manners, and argot.
 One of the most commonly used methods of explaining the importance of socialization is to analyze some unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, accident, or the result of intentional abuse, have grown up without proper socialization with adults.
 Some of these children have been segregated by people,
 Feral children may have suffered severe violence or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Some children may have been raised by animals.
 When the feral child is totally raised by non-human animals, it shows behaviors almost entirely analogous to those of the particular animal that has taken care of him, such as fear or indifference towards humans.
 Project-Based learning should make learning easier and more interesting, while scaffolding goes a bit beyond that.
 The scaffolding is not a mode of learning,
 The scaffolding can be both virtual and real.
 Virtual scaffolds are integrated into the software and have the purpose of interrogating, soliciting, and explaining the procedures that the student may have had difficulty managing on his own.
 The children are given up for adoption,
 A child should never grow up in an environment that doesn't guarantee him nutrition, care, and education.
 We believe that the affidavit represents a safe zone for these children.
 Our foster care system should provide safe, loving, stable homes,
 It is supposed that the affidavit supplements all the needs not satisfied in the house from which they were taken.
 Internet brings together some elements of both mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The characteristic elements of Internet bring about additional dimensions in terms of theory of use and gratification.
 For example, as important motivations for using the Internet,
 Eighmey and McCord's study of audience reactions to Websites identified two new aspects of motivation, namely, personal involvement and continuing relationships.
 The use of Video-Recordings,
 Nello specifico,
 In his essay, the President,
 And he even argues that these abilities,
 In the twentieth century, research has shown the existence of two pools of genetic variability, or hidden variability and expressed variability.
 With the Mutation, a new genetic variability is added, with selection it is eliminated from the pool of expressed variability.
 Generation after generation, segregation and recombination redistribute variability forward and backward between the two pools.
 For a primate with an analogous digestive apparatus to that of humans, it is difficult to meet their amino acid requirements with the plant resources available in the savanna.
 In addition, the failure to realize these activities has grave consequences: slowing growth, malnutrition, and, in the end, even death.
 The most easily accessible source of protein would have been proteins in leaves and legumes, but for primates like us, they are difficult to digest, unless they are cooked.
 Instead, animal foods like ants, termites, and eggs are not only easy to digest, but they provide a high amount of protein, containing all the essential amino acids.
 In light of all this, it should come as no surprise that our own ancestors solved their own protein problem in a certain way that chimpanzees in the savanna do today.
 The interruption of sleep is the intentional process of waking up during the normal period of sleep, which is followed by a resumption of sleep.
 This process can be easily put into practice using a relatively quiet alarm clock to bring you to a state of consciousness without fully waking you.
 If you decide to reset the clock in the middle of the night,
 Other options involve the consumption of many liquids before bedtime,
 A person enjoys a peace of mind proportional to the tension existing in his body and in his spirit.
 The less tension, the more positive the life force.
 Everyone can reach enlightenment.
 The Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha,
 In a nutshell, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple.
 The Kundalini Yoga awakens the Kundalini energy through the use of yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualizations.
 The Deity Yoga is the fulcrum of Tibetan meditation.
 The United States and the Soviet Union,
 Two years after the end of the war,
 It would have lasted for the next 40 years,
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense had already been broken,
 And more than 800,000 Soviet troops,
 To use ships for the transport of goods is certainly the most efficient way to move large volumes of people and goods across the oceans.
 The task of the Navy,
 One of the most notable examples of this is the battle of the Atlantic during World War II.
 At the same time, the German Navy,
 If the Allies had not succeeded,
 And it seems that they were first domesticated around ten thousand years ago,
 And were reared by the cultures and tribes of antiquity,
 The domestic goats were usually raised in herds,
 Already in the sixteenth century,
 Despite the fact that they were made up of parallel wooden rails, the wagonways, when compared to the slightly more accident-prone roads of the period, allowed the horses that travelled on them to reach greater speeds and to carry heavier loads.
 Gradually, however, it became clear that the rails would be more efficient if they had a bar of iron at the top.
 It became a common practice, even if the iron caused greater wear and tear on the wooden wheels of the cars.
 In the year seventeen sixty seven,
 The first half of transportation that man has known are the legs.
 His predecessor, the Australopithecus,
 And the specialization for bipedalism,
 We can start by adopting lifestyles that are more environmentally friendly,
 In many cases, this only works as a symptomatic treatment.
 It is quite evident that the world has changed a great deal due to the scientific and technological progress of humanity, while the problems have increased due to the overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of human beings.
 After the Congress adopted it on July 4, a manuscript copy signed by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson, was then sent to the printing office of John Dunlap, a few blocks away.
 In the night, between one hundred and two hundred copies were produced,
 The document was read publicly for the first time on July 8 in the courtyard of Independence hall,
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, which he read to his troops stationed in New York on July 9, while a copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap copies are the oldest extant copies of the document.
 Secondly, many paleontologists today believe that a category of dinosaurs survived and are still alive today.
 Many people tend not to consider them dinosaurs because of their feathers and their ability to fly.
 And yet,
 Like the T-Rex, they're Footed with scales and claws,
 In definitive, the manipulation of information coded in the form of Binary numbers is at the base of all computers used currently.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values,
 The internal poisoning may not be immediately evident.
 The main indication of internal poisoning could be the presence in the house of an open container of drugs or of noxious chemicals.
 Check the label to see if there are first aid instructions for that specific poison.
 The term Acaro is formally used by entomologists for this group of insects.
 The term comes from the familiarity in ancient times with bed bugs, insects that have become strongly adapted to become parasites of humans.
 And nidicolous,
 In the United States of America, multiple sclerosis (MS) accounts for about 400,000 known cases, ranking it first among neurological diseases that affect young and middle-aged people.
 The SM is a condition that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord, and optic nerve.
 The research has evidenced that the chances of developing MS in females are double that of males.
 A couple can decide that raising a child is not in their best interest,
 These couples have the option of choosing a plan of adoption for their child.
 In an adoption,
 The primary goal of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method.
 But it's not just about experimentation,
 Naturalists and philosophers focused on the classical texts,
 And were accepted as true.
 With the progressive decline of the Greek language,
 In many have observed that the physiological rhythms and behavior depend in a determinant way on the presence of endogenous cycles and on their production through biological clocks.
 There have been documented periodic rhythms,
 Biological clocks are independent oscillators,
 One of the first experiments to suggest that DNA was a genetic material was conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophages,
 He did two experiments,
 The mutations can have a range of different effects,
 The mutations that can be transmitted to the offspring are only those at the level of the germ cells,
 The naturalist tourism brings people interested in visiting natural areas,
 Among the examples of activities to be done on the spot, there are hunting, fishing, photography, birdwatching, visits to parks and the study of information regarding the ecosystem.
 For example, by visiting, photographing, and learning about the orangutans of Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave the small towns of the countryside to go to work in cars, crossing other people whose place of work is the place from which they have just come.
 In this dynamic andirivieni,
 Today, science reveals that this massive carbon-based economy has forced the biosphere outside of one of its stable conditions that has allowed human evolution over the last two million years.
 Every person participates in social life and uses the transportation systems, of which almost everyone complains.
 In the developed world,
 Why do transport systems attract so many complaints,
 The Traffic Flow is the study of the movement of individuals and vehicles from one point to another and the interactions that they generate with each other.
 Unfortunately, the study of traffic flow is complex because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted with absolute certainty.
 And, fortunately, the behavior of drivers tends to fall within a reasonably constant range,
 In order to obtain a more accurate representation of the traffic flow, the three main variables have been correlated:
 These reports are useful for planning, designing, and managing roadways.
 The insects were the first animals to take to the air.
 Most insects are.
 This allows them to exploit a greater variety of small crevices to hide in.
 But among all the insects that exist today,
 Millions of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system moved around the sun.
 But many others believed the contrary,
 But it's not sensory.
 The Amazon River is the largest and second longest river in the world.
 The Amazon is also the largest river in the world, with a width that in some places reaches six miles.
 The total amount of water that flows into the ocean from the Amazon River is equal to the amount of water that flows into the ocean from the Mississippi River.
 The main river of the Amazon is 6,387 kilometers long.
 And so, until the end of the Old Kingdom,
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom,
 The Vatican City is the smallest country in the world.
 The language of the Vatican city for legislation and official communications is Italian.
 Italian is also the everyday language spoken by most people who work within the state, while Latin is often used in religious functions.
 In the city of Vatican,
 The man began to know the basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper already in the ancient times: these elements can be discovered in nature in a native form and it is possible to extract them in a fairly simple way with the help of primitive instruments.
 Secondly, the philosopher Aristotle,
 In the same order,
 The leghe are substantially a mixture of two or more metals.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered to be metals.
 There may also be alloys composed of minute quantities of non-metals, such as carbon.
 In the universe, everything is made of matter,
 Trillions of them could fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 After its invention, the pencil has proven to be a good friend to many.
 Unfortunately, with the introduction of new writing methods, the pencil has been relegated to a lesser status and to a use that is less and less common.
 Today, everyone writes messages on the screens of computers and never have the need to approach a thermometer.
 We can only wonder what the keyboard will be like when something new comes along.
 The principle is that you need energy to put together a nucleus with a lot of protons and neutrons.
 In practice, it's like rolling a heavy cart up a hill.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they tend to break apart when a small or no force is applied.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust,
 The crust has a thickness of about 70 km in the nearest side and of 100 km in the farthest side.
 It is thicker under the seas and thinner under the mountains.
 I maria potrebbero essere più numerosi sul lato vicino because the crust is thinner.
 Theories on content are focused on the search for what satisfies or attracts individuals.
 Second, according to these theories,
 These theories analyze what it is that unites some people and pushes them to want to do what they do, and what are the factors of the context in which they live that pushes them to do or not to do certain things.
 Among the most widely accepted theories of content,
 In general, when managers start to direct their former colleagues, there are two possible reactions.
 The manager of this type finds it difficult to make unpopular decisions, to put in place disciplinary actions, to evaluate performance, to define and assign responsibility.
 All of a sudden,
 And at the end of the day,
 This attitude often generates dissension between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 The standard of excellence for virtual teams is analogous to that of conventional teams, but with some small differences.
 The members of the virtual team often serve as a point of contact for their next physical group.
 Often they have greater autonomy than members of conventional teams, since the meetings can take place according to the various time zones, which may not be covered by the local management.
 The existence of a true and proper invisible team,
 And it's the team invisibile.
 Why should an organization want to go through the long process of building an organization of learning?
 When you can use all the resources that are available to you in an effective way,
 And consequently,
 In order for an organization to be innovative,
 Angel (2006) illustrates the theory of the continuum as a method used to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 The neurobiological results have shown the physical existence of a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition. The area of research becomes narrower and therefore much more precise.
 The link between brain Pathology and behavior is at the basis of the researchers.
 Already for some time it has been known that certain types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors can influence behavior and modify certain mental functions.
 The introduction of new technologies allows us to see and investigate brain structures and processes that we've never seen before.
 This gives us a great deal of information and material to create simulation models that help us to understand our mental processes.
 Despite having a strong fantasy-science connotation, ai represents a very important branch of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of machines.
 Research into ai includes the creation of machines to automate operations that require intelligent behavior.
 Some examples of application are control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to diagnoses and questions from clients, as well as the recognition of writing, vocal and facial.
 These things have become distinct disciplines,
 The IA system is nowadays used in economics, medicine, engineering and military, as well as being integrated in several software applications for home computers and video games.
 The gite represents a fundamental part of the didactics.
 The solution is offered by technology with virtual tours.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great pretext for sharing travel experiences and reflections with future classes.
 Every year, for example,
 I mean, the students,
 Since students are usually the most critical audience,
 I also Blog to make students more aware of the moment they are in.
 The Blog is a tool that aims to encourage collaboration and develop student learning beyond the normal school day.
 The correct use of Blogs can help students become more critical and analytical. By actively responding to Internet materials, students can define their own position within the writings of others, as well as delineate their own perspectives on specific issues.
 Ottawa is the suggestive and bilingual capital of Canada, rich in art galleries and museums that tell the past and the present of the country.
 More to the South are the Niagara falls,
 And all this and more makes Ontario typically Canadian.
 Some of these are almost deserts.
 If you look at the population,
 The Islands of East Africa are situated in the Indian ocean, off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest,
 Almost all the minor Islands,
 In the lands, the Arabs also brought Islam, which embarked on a long journey towards the Comoros and Mayotte.
 In the fifteenth century,
 North of the Sahel,
 To the travelers,
 It is also useful to wear a ring.
 It is appropriate that women should realize that cultural differences can give rise to what they themselves consider a molestation, and that it is not unusual to be followed, seized by the arm, etc.
 And, above all,
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by the Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, with the name of Anfa, it was a port of strategic importance used by the Phoenicians, the Romans and the Merinides.
 The Portuguese destroyed it,
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city, which was called Daru l-Badya, then called Casablanca by the Spanish merchants who chose these places for their commercial bases.
 In all of Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting cities for shopping.
 In the old Medina,
 Goma is a tourist town in the Eastern part of the Democratic Republic of Congo, not far from Rwanda.
 In two thousand and two, the lava from the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma, burying much of the city's roads, especially those in the center.
 While Goma is reasonably safe, it is advisable to be well informed before making any visits outside of Goma, in order to evaluate the state of the clashes that are still ongoing in the province of North Kivu.
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent to the Nyiragongo volcano,
 It is possible to use a boda-boda (taxi-motorcycle) to move around Goma. The normal price, in local currency, is about 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Also, in consequence of its relative inaccessibility,
 Today, Timbuktu is a decadent city, but for its reputation it remains a tourist attraction, and it also has an airport.
 In 1990 it was included in the list of Unesco world heritage sites that are in danger,
 And it was a huge hit.
 With its more Arabic than African touch,
 The Kruger National Park is located in northeastern South Africa and stretches eastward along the border with Mozambique, north of the Limpopo River, and south of the Crocodile River.
 With a surface of 19,500 km², the park comprises 14 different ecozones, each of which supports a different wildlife.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa,
 As for all the National parks of South Africa, there are daily contributions for conservation and entrance to the park.
 An even more useful Wildcard,
 The Island of Hong Kong,
 The series of buildings that make up Hong Kong's skyline has been likened to a scintillating bar graph, even more so because it is framed by the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To enjoy the best views of Hong Kong,
 Most of the urban development of Hong Kong has been concentrated on the reclaimed land of the northern coast, which is densely populated.
 This is the place that the English colonists chose for themselves, so if you're looking for evidence of the colonial past of this land, this is a good place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the largest Mangrove forest in the world.
 The Sundarbans are a designated UNESCO world heritage site.
 However, the forests are not only made up of mangrove swamps.
 And about a third of that is made up of mangrove forests.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans have become a sanctuary for wildlife, with an estimated 400 Royal Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 The buses leave from the inter-district bus station,
 Because buses between different districts are often full, it is best to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most of the neighborhoods are reached by comfortable and robust Japanese small buses.
 The shared taxis are a convenient and fast way to reach nearby locations, including Paro (150 Nu) and Punakha (200 Nu).
 The bridge over the Oyapock River is a suspension bridge that joins the city of Oiapoque, in Brazil, to Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, in French Guiana.
 It has two spans,
 Under the bridge, the vertical space is 15 meters. The construction was finished in August 2011, but the opening to traffic only took place in March 2017.
 In September 2017, when the Brazilian customs checkpoints are expected to be fully operational,
 The Guaraní were the most important indigenous group that lived in the present-day Eastern Paraguay.
 The Chaco region was inhabited by other indigenous groups, such as the Guaycuru and the Payaguá, who lived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 The Paraguay River,
 They began a period that lasted three centuries,
 From the foundation of Asuncion,
 Everybody knows Argentina has one of the best polo teams and the best players in the world.
 In December, in the polo fields of Las Cañitas,
 And here you can watch minor tournaments and even play them.
 To receive information about tournaments and the purchase of tickets for polo matches,
 The Falkland Islands have their own official currency, the Falkland Islands pound, which is pegged to the British pound sterling.
 The only bank on the Islands, located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West shop, offers currency exchange.
 But in general,
 On the peripheral Islands,
 It is almost impossible to exchange the currency of the Falkland Islands outside the Islands, so change your money before you leave.
 Since Montevideo is south of the equator,
 During the summer months,
 The winter can be deceptively cold.
 And there are no definite seasons of drought and rain.
 Even though many of the park's animals are used to seeing people,
 Authorities of the park recommend that you keep a distance of at least 100 yards from bears and wolves and a distance of 25 yards from all other wild animals.
 However docile they may seem.
 Every year, dozens of visitors get injured for not maintaining a proper distance.
 And keep in mind that odors can attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid carrying or cooking foods with very strong odors, and keep your camping area clean.
 The capital of Samoa is Apia,
 Apia was founded between 1850 and 1860 and is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In this port, the naval standoff of 1889 took place, in which seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the port.
 Except for one British cruiser.
 In the course of the struggle for independence,
 There are many beaches,
 The North Shore beaches,
 It's mainly sandy beaches,
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive,
 It's a family-friendly beach,
 The other local beer is called Manta.
 There may be many French wines, but the Australian and New Zealand wines could better withstand the journey.
 But the water from the tap is totally safe to drink,
 Secondo gli australiani, the flat white is born from a foreign idea.
 Hot chocolate is at the same level as the Belgian one.
 For all the year round,
 Always ask for advice from the authorities,
 Cubomedusae appear from October to April near the beaches and estuaries of rivers north of Seventeen Seventy. Outside of this period, they can only be found occasionally.
 Sharks are present, but rarely attack humans.
 The habitat of the salt-water crocodile is mainly the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton,
 By booking in advance, the traveler has the serenity of finding a place to sleep once he or she arrives at their destination.
 But it's not always the case.
 The travel agencies generally propose packages including breakfast, transfers from and to the airport, or even combined flight and hotel packages.
 You can also keep the reservation for you if you need time to think about the offer or to get additional documents necessary for your destination.
 However, any modifications or requests must be made beforehand to the travel agent and not directly to the hotel.
 In the case of some musical festivals,
 To be near the center of the action,
 Once the music has finished on the main stages, there may be sections of the festival where the music continues late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the Baltic Sea in winter,
 The cruises to St Petersburg include the time to be dedicated to the exploration of the city.
 And generally, casinos do everything they can to increase the amount of time and money spent by their guests.
 They usually offer food, drink, and exclusive entertainment to keep the mood of the guests high.
 However, the state of intoxication alters the capacity for judgment, and every good gambler knows how important it is to remain sober.
 Whoever decides to drive at high altitudes or on mountain passes must take into consideration the possibility of snow, ice or temperatures close to zero.
 On icy, slippery, and snowy roads,
 During a snowstorm, in a very short time, so much snow can fall that you can be trapped.
 Even the precipitation and the gusts of snow, or the formation of ice or condensation on the vehicle windows, can reduce visibility.
 However, ice and snow are normal conditions in many countries, and traffic continues to flow almost uninterruptedly throughout the year.
 The safari are probably the greatest tourist attraction of Africa and the focus of many visitors' holidays.
 In its popular usage, the term safari refers to overland travel,
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, tend to get closer to cars, so a normal setup will do.
 The lions, the cheetahs, and the Leopards,
 A walking safari is a safari that can last from a few hours to several days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2012, and part of the events will be held in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two summer Olympics. The first Olympics had been held in Tokyo in 1964.
 If your booking for flights and accommodation for 2020 was made before the postponement was announced, you may find yourself in a difficult situation.
 However, most of the cancellation policies related to the Coronavirus, as of late March 2020, do not arrive until July 2020, when the Olympics are scheduled.
 The cost of most event tickets will be between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, while normal tickets will cost around 7,000 yen.
 Um, I'm not sure.
 If you don't have an iron, or if you don't like wearing ironed socks,
 Give attention to not exposing the tissues to too high a temperature,
 There are various ways to sanitize water,
 In some zones it is sufficient to boil the water for a minute, in others it takes many minutes.
 In case of doubt,
 Travellers may come in contact with animal parasites that are not found in their own regions.
 The parasites can spoil the food,
 The same infectious and dangerous animals that can injure or kill people with their strength are not usually classified as dangerous animals.
 Duty-Free shopping is an opportunity to buy tax-free products in certain locations.
 Travellers who go to countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot of money, especially on things like alcohol and tobacco.
 The stretch of the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway between Point Marion and Fairmont is the one that presents the most difficult driving conditions,
 If one has not the habit of driving on country roads, it is advisable to keep one's eyes well open, as there are steep declivities, narrow lanes, and sharp curves.
 The speed limits displayed are definitely lower than those applied in the previous and subsequent sections.
 Strangely, though, in this area,
 And in Bavaria they are alquanto saporiti and variegati,
 The desserts with fruit are an intramontable classic, from those with apples available all year round to those with cherries and plums, which make their appearance during the summer.
 Diversi dolci da forno tedeschi contengono anche mandorle, nocciole e altra frutta a guscio. Le torte più popolari spesso si accompagnano molto bene ad una tazza di caffè forte.
 Those who desire to taste small but richly flavored cakes,
 Curry is a dish prepared with herbs and spices,
 The curry can be presented both as a dry and as a wet dish, depending on the amount of liquid it contains.
 In northern India and Pakistan, for curries,
 Data the presence of 17,000 Islands,
 However, when used without further specification, the term generally indicates foods originating in the central and eastern part of the main island, Java.
 The cuisine of Java, now widely diffused throughout the archipelago, offers a series of dishes of simple preparation.
 The stirrups are supports for the rider's feet,
 They ensure greater stability to the rider,
 If a fantino is thrown from a horse but has a foot caught in the stirrup, he could be dragged along by the horse as it runs away.
 First of all, the majority of the knights wear riding boots with a heel and a sole that is quite smooth and rather thin.
 In the following, some saddles, especially English ones, have inserted safety bars, which make it so that a leather stirrup sticks to the saddle when, in case of a fall, the rider pulls it back.
 Cochamó Valley,
 The peaks of the Alps include breathtaking panoramas.
 The sports on the snow in free descent, like skiing and snowboarding, are very widespread and involve sliding on the snow thanks to the use of skis or snowboards attached to the feet.
 And it's one of the main tourist activities,
 The principle at the base of skiing is very old.
 In the United States,
 Ski touring,
 It's linked, even if usually not to ski touring or to skimo,
 Think of the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 If the conditions are good,
 But, as it happens,
 However, regarding this aspect, the Schengen area works more like a single country.
 If you remain within this area,
 At the same time, if you have a Schengen visa,
 Some tax agencies consider an item to be an antique if it is at least 100 years old.
 The definition presents geographic differences,
 The objects of craftsmanship could be defined as pieces of antiques, even if they are more recent than similar objects produced in series.
 The reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture on which this trade is based is also the basis for many other professions.
 Even in the course of time, not always all the Sami were involved in reindeer herding on a large scale, some lived on fishing, hunting and similar activities, using reindeer mainly as work animals.
 Today, many Sámi people work in modern professions.
 Even though it is often used, in particular among non-Rom people, the word Zingaro is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and a misperception of the Roma.
 If a travel warning is issued for the destination you are visiting, there may be consequences for your travel health insurance or your travel cancellation insurance.
 You might also be interested in the opinions of governments other than your own, but keep in mind that those opinions are aimed at the citizens of those governments.
 Americans in the Middle East,
 The warnings are simply a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The opinions reported are often superficial, generic, and simplistic compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 And the word avverse,
 In every part of the world,
 The winds, the rain,
 Among the meteorological phenomena of strong regional and seasonal intensity, there are storms, snowstorms, blizzards, and sandstorms.
 It is recommended that travelers inquire about the adverse meteorological conditions that may affect their area,
 Anyone who plans to visit a country that is potentially considered a war zone,
 Looking on the Internet,
 A course will normally cover all the issues discussed here in much more detail, usually by using practical experience.
 A course of 2 to 5 days,
 Books and magazines about survival in nature are plentiful,
 Travellers who are planning to have a sex change operation abroad must ensure that they have valid travel documents for their return journey.
 The intention of governments to issue passports without indication of sex,
 And the same is true of the United States.
 Even the inspections at security controls have become much more scrupulous in the era post 11 September 2001.
 People who are pre-operative transgender should not expect to pass through security without their privacy and dignity being intact.
 The currents of Risacca are constituted by the return flow of the waves that break on the shore, often near a coral reef or similar formation.
 And the return flow,
 The greater part of the deaths occur in the attempt to swim against the current,
 As soon as you get out of the current,
 Look for a place where you won't be trapped again, or consider waiting for help, based on your skills and if you've been spotted.
 The shock of reentry,
 Travellers who have found it easy to adapt to the new culture,
 When you return home after living abroad,
 In the first experience abroad, it's likely you'll encounter people who are patient and understanding, aware of the fact that travelers in a new country need to adapt.
 Many people did not imagine patience and awareness were necessary even for those who returned home.
 The show of sounds and lights of the pyramid is what there is most interesting in the zone for children.
 Before the beginning of the show,
 Always you hear the noise of tourists and vendors.
 The Sphinx becomes the background and the narrator of a long tale.
 And the scenes are projected onto the pyramids.
 Claimed by various countries, the Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, have the largest number of bases, of which sixteen are active in 2020.
 The archipelago is 120 kilometers north of the peninsula.
 In the other Islands are Livingston and Deception Island, the latter of which is the caldera of a volcano still active,
 The land of Ellsworth is the region that lies south of the peninsula and faces the sea of Bellingshausen.
 And then they merge into the Ellsworth mountains,
 The northern part, known as the Sentinel Range,
 In remote areas,
 A satellite phone is not generally a substitute for a cell phone,
 The service is often used by recreational boaters,
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to give you more information about connecting to this service.
 One of the options that's becoming more and more popular among those who are planning to take a gap year is to travel and learn.
 It's particularly widespread among neo-diplomates,
 In many cases,
 Usually, the enrollment fee,
 Finland is the ideal destination for those who love to sail. In the land of a thousand lakes, there are also thousands of islands, both within the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 And it's not necessary to have a yacht for the archipelagoes and the lakes.
 Even if the coastal archipelagos and the bigger lakes are certainly big enough for any yacht, the smaller boats or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 Nautical pursuits are the national pastime of Finland,
 But in general it is a very singular fact.
 Most of the different Baltic cruises include a longer stay in St Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that it is possible to visit the historic town for two whole days,
 For the disembarkation on land, a separate visa will not be required using the shore excursions.
 Some brochures also propose cruises to Berlin, Germany. As you can see from the map above, Berlin is not near the sea, and the visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Travelling by air can be scary for people of all ages and conditions, especially if they've never flown before or have had some traumatic experience.
 There is nothing to be ashamed of.
 For some people, understanding how airplanes work and what happens during a flight can be helpful in overcoming a fear based on what is unknown or a lack of control.
 The couriers are well paid to deliver goods quickly.
 For some routes,
 On some routes, air shipments would take days for unloading and customs.
 The only way to get it there faster would be to send it as cargo.
 The way to fly first class or business class is to pay a lot of money.
 However, the price to be paid is high: Indicatively, one can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare and up to eleven times the normal first-class fare.
 In general, on direct flights from A to B, it's not even worth looking for discounts on first or business class seats.
 There are a number of travelers,
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau,
 And it's a Multi-Ethnic country.
 In 1994, the conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in the eastern part of Moldova, with its own government and currency, but not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations,
 The religion predominant in Moldavia is the Christian Orthodox.
 It is the third largest city in Turkey, with a population of around 3.7 million.
 The ancient city of Smirna,
 Although in the city one breathes an atmosphere more like that of Mediterranean Europe than that of traditional Turkey, the wide avenues, the buildings with glass facades and the modern shopping centers are dotted with the characteristic red tile roofs, the market of the eighteenth century and the ancient mosques and churches.
 In the village of Haldarsvik,
 On the porch of the church,
 A half an hour is sufficient to walk around the enchanting village.
 A north of Sintra,
 The Scotturb bus number 403 regularly runs to Sintra, and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Always to the North, visit the great sanctuary of the Madonna di Fatima, a place of Marian apparitions famous throughout the world.
 Remember that the site you are visiting is basically a cesspool, and has a meaning that is almost incalculable to a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women surviving in these places,
 Treat the place with all the dignity, seriousness, and respect it deserves.
 Avoid defiling these places by defacing the structures with graffiti.
 All the people in Barcelona speak Catalan.
 However, the majority of the signs are written exclusively in Catalan, which is the first official language.
 The Spanish, however, is largely used even for public transportation and other services.
 In metropolitan, the regular announcements are only in Catalan.
 The Parisians have a reputation for being egotistical, rude, and arrogant.
 The best way to get along in Paris,
 The rough exterior of the Parisians will vanish quickly if you make a display of some basic good manners.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is rich in forests, mostly beech, fir and spruce, and is characterized by a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Thanks to a multiplicity of microclimates, soils and levels of altitude, it presents a great variety of vegetable communities.
 The area also hosts a great variety of animal and bird species.
 In these places live rare species like the European Brown bear, the wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the Wildcat and the Cedar-Wood Pigeon, alongside with several other animal species that are more widespread.
 When visiting monasteries, women are required to wear skirts that cover their knees and to cover their shoulders.
 The greater part of the monasteries,
 In a similar way, men are required to wear long pants,
 Anche questi possono essere presi in prestito presso il magazzino all'ingresso, tuttavia gli indumenti non vengono lavati dopo ogni utente, per cui indossando queste gonne potreste non sentirvi a vostro agio.
 As in the Mediterranean,
 The Pa amb Oli is a simple, typical summer meal,
 All nouns, in addition to the pronoun Sie, which is used for the formal you,
 This represents an important mechanism for distinguishing between certain verbs and complements.
 This aspect probably also facilitates reading, although the necessity of understanding whether a verb or an adjective is used in a substantivized form makes the writing rather complex.
 The Italian language is relatively simple.
 The main letters to pay attention to are the C and the G,
 And make sure you pronounce the R's differently.
 And the most regular of all,
 So, reading this basic grammar book could help you a lot with Persian grammar and understanding Persian sentences.
 If you already know a Romance language,
 However, people with a minimal knowledge of the Spanish language may come to the precipitous conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and therefore need not be studied separately.
 And so,
 Since light pollution in their heyday,
 The majority of modern research telescopes are huge structures in remote areas where the weather is good.
 The admiration of the blooming of the cherry trees, known as hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept originated in China, where it was preferred the flowering of the plums.
 In Japan, the first festivals for the blooming of the cherry trees were organized by the Emperor only for himself and for other members of the aristocracy close to the Imperial court.
 Plants give their best when they are in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to take even just one.
 Even if you visit an Italian garden,
 In general, Singapore is a very safe and easy city to get around in.
 And so, being in the high Tropics,
 Some buses also go North,
 Make sure the bus you want to take goes all the way into Hebron,
 The courses of the inland waterways can be an excellent theme around which to organize a vacation.
 For example, you can visit the castles in the Loire Valley and the Rhine Valley, you can take a cruise to visit the interesting cities on the Danube, or you can sail on the Erie Canal.
 In addition, they define the routes of hiking trails and bike paths.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of Christianity, and it celebrates the birth of Jesus.
 Most of the traditions linked to this festival have been adopted even by Non-Believers in Christian countries and by Non-Christians all over the world.
 A tradition has it that one should spend the night of Easter resting awake in an open place in order to be able to admire the dawn.
 There are, of course,
 In the more traditional churches,
 All the animals that originally came to the Islands,
 But the distance from the continent was considerable,
 After the arrival of man,
 If you visit the Arctic or the Antarctic during the winter,
 This phenomenon offers the possibility of observing the Aurora Borealis,
 Since the territories are sparsely populated,
 In Japan, the culture of work is more hierarchical and formal than the one to which Westerners tend to be accustomed.
 And the way to do that,
 The harmony of the workplace,
 The workers must often receive the approval of their superiors in regard to every decision, and they are expected to obey instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.1634597852457969, 'precisions': [0.5882177212164665, 0.31917329093799685, 0.19900768028274315, 0.12879229871645273], 'brevity_penalty': 0.6206258055072462, 'length_ratio': 0.677035718619797, 'translation_length': 16737, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 39.67652998969321, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.6963034906818462, 'scores': [0.5045626759529114, 0.40899911522865295, 0.8952729105949402, 0.4217558205127716, 0.4676455855369568, 0.38818779587745667, 0.8805214762687683, 0.8866261839866638, 0.8882470726966858, 0.847621738910675, 0.43124082684516907, 0.8942367434501648, 0.3847772777080536, 0.8745788931846619, 0.4100961983203888, 0.7308518290519714, 0.5714841485023499, 0.3530656397342682, 0.9099838137626648, 0.7508696913719177, 0.9332252144813538, 0.7570520043373108, 0.8307483196258545, 0.7695691585540771, 0.3289000689983368, 0.915443480014801, 0.7668464779853821, 0.8744475841522217, 0.37029382586479187, 0.9000549912452698, 0.32765933871269226, 0.6145046949386597, 0.41872891783714294, 0.9117469787597656, 0.406429260969162, 0.8902174830436707, 0.7168466448783875, 0.8881733417510986, 0.4219990074634552, 0.9350084066390991, 0.7319446802139282, 0.9408004879951477, 0.5608997344970703, 0.9034604430198669, 0.4789922833442688, 0.4866620600223541, 0.8879645466804504, 0.6483609080314636, 0.42522376775741577, 0.8056952357292175, 0.9094768166542053, 0.912462055683136, 0.9092300534248352, 0.9295336604118347, 0.8962481021881104, 0.8896473050117493, 0.8096152544021606, 0.879350483417511, 0.9093607068061829, 0.934441864490509, 0.8920379281044006, 0.40131908655166626, 0.8535443544387817, 0.5723714232444763, 0.86287921667099, 0.8867557644844055, 0.8732098937034607, 0.5066211819648743, 0.39255788922309875, 0.5254757404327393, 0.6094769835472107, 0.8517556190490723, 0.8374325633049011, 0.44207563996315, 0.33449944853782654, 0.3500261604785919, 0.8712803721427917, 0.8378257155418396, 0.925162136554718, 0.8915131688117981, 0.772793173789978, 0.31596240401268005, 0.26026561856269836, 0.7411310076713562, 0.7245554327964783, 0.4600413739681244, 0.59197598695755, 0.4509015381336212, 0.9161275029182434, 0.8633450865745544, 0.805332362651825, 0.8398107886314392, 0.3497728109359741, 0.933846652507782, 0.9065867066383362, 0.6308915019035339, 0.8011417984962463, 0.604326605796814, 0.3372918963432312, 0.3147110044956207, 0.3953842222690582, 0.7685310244560242, 0.3361828625202179, 0.9028034210205078, 0.8626836538314819, 0.4974704682826996, 0.8599305748939514, 0.8857892155647278, 0.35183075070381165, 0.7542951107025146, 0.549376904964447, 0.30664220452308655, 0.8908767104148865, 0.7251453995704651, 0.8588512539863586, 0.8219760060310364, 0.8879231214523315, 0.8856436610221863, 0.66922527551651, 0.9035594463348389, 0.8624408841133118, 0.7298830151557922, 0.8760711550712585, 0.5908346176147461, 0.9093295931816101, 0.6352526545524597, 0.8817794322967529, 0.9144740700721741, 0.9032113552093506, 0.7634198069572449, 0.8614925146102905, 0.8522899746894836, 0.8744059205055237, 0.7139648795127869, 0.8883185982704163, 0.7786727547645569, 0.8313673734664917, 0.8929023742675781, 0.9303341507911682, 0.8472760915756226, 0.6917165517807007, 0.4711253345012665, 0.566439688205719, 0.8451286554336548, 0.42885228991508484, 0.8710325360298157, 0.8393154144287109, 0.8831114172935486, 0.8401954174041748, 0.8924782872200012, 0.6482896208763123, 0.6376094818115234, 0.8120281100273132, 0.7855786085128784, 0.8817991614341736, 0.5220004916191101, 0.8942347764968872, 0.6849826574325562, 0.8540033102035522, 0.8622639179229736, 0.8539344072341919, 0.3606165945529938, 0.5930231809616089, 0.834795355796814, 0.9160565733909607, 0.7788159251213074, 0.6711059808731079, 0.8654888272285461, 0.8675145506858826, 0.5283240675926208, 0.7626963257789612, 0.8716959953308105, 0.8601294159889221, 0.6625513434410095, 0.3556613028049469, 0.7094128131866455, 0.7910140156745911, 0.6648830771446228, 0.87515789270401, 0.6933156847953796, 0.5441591739654541, 0.8831624388694763, 0.9090303778648376, 0.8828728795051575, 0.8897864818572998, 0.2519037127494812, 0.7121952176094055, 0.4817488193511963, 0.712302029132843, 0.5141851305961609, 0.8056161999702454, 0.4523828327655792, 0.850006639957428, 0.5038376450538635, 0.6026769280433655, 0.9237115979194641, 0.42009374499320984, 0.7594988942146301, 0.25131818652153015, 0.8728809356689453, 0.433900386095047, 0.764714777469635, 0.7724503874778748, 0.7246167659759521, 0.8963205218315125, 0.8345522284507751, 0.5351323485374451, 0.7466946244239807, 0.3953751027584076, 0.7572694420814514, 0.544794499874115, 0.9099346995353699, 0.6081317067146301, 0.4439556896686554, 0.8872760534286499, 0.5755342245101929, 0.3175174295902252, 0.3928292691707611, 0.8978590369224548, 0.8796474933624268, 0.7364799976348877, 0.8643119931221008, 0.7485702633857727, 0.3521295487880707, 0.8563352823257446, 0.6244173645973206, 0.5555441379547119, 0.732678234577179, 0.843611478805542, 0.8700191378593445, 0.8279643654823303, 0.8912104964256287, 0.8294388651847839, 0.5517306327819824, 0.406223863363266, 0.8292834162712097, 0.5283867120742798, 0.5250698924064636, 0.9326010346412659, 0.9168171286582947, 0.8345515131950378, 0.7243329286575317, 0.4882562458515167, 0.5179420113563538, 0.5022143125534058, 0.9222425818443298, 0.5407618284225464, 0.4414529502391815, 0.4650537669658661, 0.6104836463928223, 0.8746657371520996, 0.3882368505001068, 0.5452290773391724, 0.6908883452415466, 0.500761866569519, 0.434114009141922, 0.6766126751899719, 0.8844024538993835, 0.8966042399406433, 0.47050008177757263, 0.5550400018692017, 0.8207092881202698, 0.8157550692558289, 0.9130845665931702, 0.4294022023677826, 0.7319576740264893, 0.652112603187561, 0.8876563310623169, 0.8291232585906982, 0.6274746656417847, 0.8489671945571899, 0.8235324025154114, 0.8713362812995911, 0.7653700709342957, 0.6643720269203186, 0.3998376429080963, 0.8258950114250183, 0.9121332168579102, 0.6363388895988464, 0.9432092905044556, 0.8902813196182251, 0.819966733455658, 0.8762574195861816, 0.9110288023948669, 0.9157368540763855, 0.933712363243103, 0.8018426895141602, 0.6676395535469055, 0.377078115940094, 0.3102482855319977, 0.893798291683197, 0.4144493341445923, 0.8891767859458923, 0.8937944173812866, 0.7900536060333252, 0.7407963275909424, 0.39088040590286255, 0.7883359789848328, 0.6855553984642029, 0.877223789691925, 0.855448305606842, 0.8691863417625427, 0.6200934052467346, 0.4907000958919525, 0.8197659850120544, 0.6216597557067871, 0.49440357089042664, 0.3195550739765167, 0.8621435165405273, 0.8773402571678162, 0.8793520331382751, 0.7212383151054382, 0.7274416089057922, 0.6762062311172485, 0.8811240792274475, 0.6009074449539185, 0.4508477747440338, 0.8486524224281311, 0.6702728867530823, 0.8556762933731079, 0.41728678345680237, 0.4075309634208679, 0.8332704901695251, 0.8461399674415588, 0.8790221810340881, 0.4031398892402649, 0.8133863806724548, 0.8539328575134277, 0.3534005284309387, 0.899565577507019, 0.8044641613960266, 0.683378279209137, 0.6663151383399963, 0.3296596109867096, 0.8106754422187805, 0.8780439496040344, 0.9038244485855103, 0.6199106574058533, 0.7958781123161316, 0.5057371258735657, 0.6523006558418274, 0.7707756161689758, 0.5054438710212708, 0.68233722448349, 0.5610937476158142, 0.8598765730857849, 0.8836477398872375, 0.4680126905441284, 0.6319080591201782, 0.5193403363227844, 0.7686037421226501, 0.5304421186447144, 0.46972283720970154, 0.5254335999488831, 0.8705756664276123, 0.8612752556800842, 0.6929242610931396, 0.5214825868606567, 0.3802239000797272, 0.8712841868400574, 0.46265825629234314, 0.6150807738304138, 0.6469353437423706, 0.4316626489162445, 0.6010540127754211, 0.7498554587364197, 0.5115968585014343, 0.7390608191490173, 0.7295559644699097, 0.7834928631782532, 0.8130363821983337, 0.4336918592453003, 0.40892818570137024, 0.2784038484096527, 0.8060804009437561, 0.739423930644989, 0.8995705246925354, 0.8103057742118835, 0.8572383522987366, 0.7385236620903015, 0.5258229374885559, 0.5415874123573303, 0.43935468792915344, 0.46675410866737366, 0.682435154914856, 0.4461338520050049, 0.8107094168663025, 0.3577095866203308, 0.9052345752716064, 0.57565838098526, 0.3255264163017273, 0.6209627985954285, 0.7278725504875183, 0.8679935336112976, 0.8628250956535339, 0.44309231638908386, 0.7389900088310242, 0.7892170548439026, 0.3840681314468384, 0.42457401752471924, 0.8390322923660278, 0.5536951422691345, 0.5818379521369934, 0.49507012963294983, 0.3858276307582855, 0.8817476630210876, 0.8384334444999695, 0.5284249186515808, 0.8508896231651306, 0.8296887874603271, 0.900790274143219, 0.8476862907409668, 0.5000219345092773, 0.8646091222763062, 0.8826122879981995, 0.5506805181503296, 0.6999807953834534, 0.7384122014045715, 0.9129190444946289, 0.4069591760635376, 0.6695915460586548, 0.6918097138404846, 0.7578158974647522, 0.8064272403717041, 0.8574865460395813, 0.8628576397895813, 0.5583718419075012, 0.9034165740013123, 0.865567684173584, 0.9018394351005554, 0.6238990426063538, 0.38916513323783875, 0.8134924173355103, 0.4422479569911957, 0.5190333724021912, 0.8735423684120178, 0.862629234790802, 0.5365554094314575, 0.7372271418571472, 0.8651777505874634, 0.875037431716919, 0.7365490794181824, 0.6167405843734741, 0.5167872905731201, 0.8908084630966187, 0.6512474417686462, 0.37087640166282654, 0.6080453991889954, 0.8372378945350647, 0.7876802682876587, 0.41630181670188904, 0.46609365940093994, 0.8277199864387512, 0.7422606945037842, 0.43868979811668396, 0.47381678223609924, 0.5404623746871948, 0.8791331648826599, 0.49668386578559875, 0.8722569346427917, 0.8012778162956238, 0.45108678936958313, 0.3979856073856354, 0.7929902076721191, 0.8717953562736511, 0.5186879634857178, 0.4312078654766083, 0.27463504672050476, 0.3322838842868805, 0.3086438477039337, 0.7847586274147034, 0.7834597229957581, 0.411001056432724, 0.8579832315444946, 0.805414080619812, 0.470165878534317, 0.8688259720802307, 0.5526741743087769, 0.661264181137085, 0.8810269236564636, 0.6624221205711365, 0.7736303806304932, 0.7277113795280457, 0.8559228777885437, 0.900863766670227, 0.8194414377212524, 0.6877674460411072, 0.8255438208580017, 0.3799400329589844, 0.880404531955719, 0.5035556554794312, 0.859306275844574, 0.8554958701133728, 0.8506742119789124, 0.803414523601532, 0.6230050921440125, 0.8310378789901733, 0.818868100643158, 0.3528829514980316, 0.28593629598617554, 0.8281452059745789, 0.9420152902603149, 0.9130201935768127, 0.8662244081497192, 0.41905689239501953, 0.9352617859840393, 0.6302303075790405, 0.8905289173126221, 0.8981345295906067, 0.39893361926078796, 0.5827258229255676, 0.7843255996704102, 0.4555675983428955, 0.804768443107605, 0.8347510099411011, 0.7835647463798523, 0.7023732662200928, 0.941829264163971, 0.8636380434036255, 0.6441690325737, 0.8571483492851257, 0.43941041827201843, 0.35899126529693604, 0.4078519642353058, 0.4893513023853302, 0.8687092065811157, 0.8307550549507141, 0.8412726521492004, 0.8688530325889587, 0.8878054618835449, 0.8825006484985352, 0.8917349576950073, 0.8284333348274231, 0.7605042457580566, 0.8858303427696228, 0.6301150321960449, 0.6013092398643494, 0.7672330141067505, 0.7453258037567139, 0.6562642455101013, 0.6950726509094238, 0.6767207384109497, 0.8621736168861389, 0.6172014474868774, 0.3686240017414093, 0.6134982705116272, 0.4243324398994446, 0.6479693651199341, 0.3357516825199127, 0.9229627251625061, 0.3938543200492859, 0.7883316278457642, 0.5242611765861511, 0.5764365196228027, 0.6901053190231323, 0.4691050350666046, 0.5620357394218445, 0.5544713139533997, 0.8209155797958374, 0.8563935160636902, 0.873862624168396, 0.29571446776390076, 0.4644382894039154, 0.6051797866821289, 0.3576315641403198, 0.7364324927330017, 0.7148334980010986, 0.8830075860023499, 0.8637550473213196, 0.6726198792457581, 0.8473406434059143, 0.9198468327522278, 0.7490102648735046, 0.7828083634376526, 0.8753662109375, 0.349494606256485, 0.5017896294593811, 0.8391069769859314, 0.675326406955719, 0.7479750514030457, 0.874187171459198, 0.9190824627876282, 0.8650057911872864, 0.8566363453865051, 0.31753912568092346, 0.8839952349662781, 0.8356831669807434, 0.8710224032402039, 0.8086003661155701, 0.8805574774742126, 0.31541603803634644, 0.8843616843223572, 0.5156099200248718, 0.821223795413971, 0.5240585207939148, 0.5604029297828674, 0.8665667176246643, 0.5036662220954895, 0.595615565776825, 0.8905014395713806, 0.5373745560646057, 0.43440017104148865, 0.6343589425086975, 0.7655866742134094, 0.7205597758293152, 0.8969303965568542, 0.8097245097160339, 0.8187816739082336, 0.2885614335536957, 0.8827900886535645, 0.8897306323051453, 0.3730470836162567, 0.6604875326156616, 0.8649217486381531, 0.8845110535621643, 0.7792982459068298, 0.803458034992218, 0.8818445801734924, 0.564821183681488, 0.3988208472728729, 0.762214720249176, 0.5159878134727478, 0.9190811514854431, 0.543422520160675, 0.41427189111709595, 0.8289753794670105, 0.8871817588806152, 0.7399986386299133, 0.8069212436676025, 0.40812209248542786, 0.447277307510376, 0.6838751435279846, 0.8966336846351624, 0.9425544142723083, 0.5205263495445251, 0.8713801503181458, 0.4198872148990631, 0.3886927366256714, 0.6459072828292847, 0.8916069865226746, 0.8565430045127869, 0.7625232934951782, 0.6318563222885132, 0.8671513199806213, 0.8766675591468811, 0.7080433964729309, 0.9057305455207825, 0.7924671769142151, 0.6684795022010803, 0.8925661444664001, 0.8346680998802185, 0.8763747811317444, 0.875896155834198, 0.5619968175888062, 0.8318138718605042, 0.3851330578327179, 0.8287256956100464, 0.5354476571083069, 0.6576620936393738, 0.8495569825172424, 0.34072452783584595, 0.4699084460735321, 0.897543728351593, 0.887245774269104, 0.9071598052978516, 0.8493671417236328, 0.5841042399406433, 0.421124130487442, 0.809952437877655, 0.7231423258781433, 0.34883543848991394, 0.6971992254257202, 0.9058119654655457, 0.8268067836761475, 0.7717562317848206, 0.883855402469635, 0.9223961234092712, 0.9195127487182617, 0.8949452042579651, 0.8488145470619202, 0.8460144400596619, 0.7786247730255127, 0.8766459226608276, 0.44944292306900024, 0.5752503275871277, 0.8904483914375305, 0.3858366012573242, 0.3653934895992279, 0.666711151599884, 0.6075184941291809, 0.8716126084327698, 0.8667306900024414, 0.8875566720962524, 0.6905942559242249, 0.7099616527557373, 0.650350034236908, 0.45477530360221863, 0.901840329170227, 0.6101433634757996, 0.44588202238082886, 0.7514472603797913, 0.40508541464805603, 0.45114555954933167, 0.332795649766922, 0.7051929235458374, 0.8409456610679626, 0.3102283179759979, 0.8871558308601379, 0.5509538054466248, 0.8871327042579651, 0.9286578893661499, 0.3910830020904541, 0.916222870349884, 0.7993455529212952, 0.8685005307197571, 0.763342022895813, 0.8858405947685242, 0.5107164978981018, 0.8449457287788391, 0.7927030920982361, 0.44217780232429504, 0.6303249001502991, 0.8540729880332947, 0.9129477739334106, 0.7657783627510071, 0.8562989830970764, 0.44307997822761536, 0.42621973156929016, 0.8168641328811646, 0.6236068606376648, 0.882710874080658, 0.9090717434883118, 0.6167454719543457, 0.7305770516395569, 0.6879888772964478, 0.667449414730072, 0.8797544240951538, 0.5707469582557678, 0.901365339756012, 0.8476502299308777, 0.917186975479126, 0.8033270239830017, 0.3784938156604767, 0.8814600706100464, 0.7985237240791321, 0.7538164258003235, 0.9097324013710022, 0.3446342349052429, 0.6024205088615417, 0.4567098617553711, 0.9012181162834167, 0.5165005326271057, 0.6386699080467224, 0.7845812439918518, 0.7880976796150208, 0.8746660351753235, 0.3629894554615021, 0.3427961766719818, 0.8819118142127991, 0.646061360836029, 0.49679139256477356, 0.6574048399925232, 0.7800332307815552, 0.7250503897666931, 0.872826337814331, 0.42606309056282043, 0.7651941180229187, 0.8961799740791321, 0.7136741280555725, 0.9331889152526855, 0.8735612034797668, 0.5134158134460449, 0.42378225922584534, 0.6088321805000305, 0.609812319278717, 0.598913848400116, 0.5571649670600891, 0.6539136171340942, 0.7891197800636292, 0.8401839733123779, 0.6626386046409607, 0.3729209303855896, 0.7395544648170471, 0.40175992250442505, 0.6437858939170837, 0.7795989513397217, 0.784545361995697, 0.7772198915481567, 0.8845935463905334, 0.3927251398563385, 0.9172298312187195, 0.8181319832801819, 0.8892600536346436, 0.5404416918754578, 0.5935658812522888, 0.8654704689979553, 0.96678227186203, 0.5519766807556152, 0.6929391026496887, 0.7180392146110535, 0.8406042456626892, 0.7906875014305115, 0.9031086564064026, 0.5814356207847595, 0.8521133065223694, 0.8500252962112427, 0.9097971320152283, 0.8824285268783569, 0.7349540591239929, 0.8060597777366638, 0.4994044601917267, 0.6873499155044556, 0.895328938961029, 0.9169992804527283, 0.9110644459724426, 0.785873293876648, 0.8573098182678223, 0.30477115511894226, 0.6686068773269653, 0.6643243432044983, 0.7372050285339355, 0.9011211395263672, 0.4457066059112549, 0.8626353740692139, 0.5573296546936035, 0.7166267037391663, 0.848400890827179, 0.8816974759101868, 0.8386262059211731, 0.8050471544265747, 0.7385550141334534, 0.5273798704147339, 0.47826316952705383, 0.7792115211486816, 0.7646902799606323, 0.49712398648262024, 0.7660729885101318, 0.8192338943481445, 0.45537036657333374, 0.4443836510181427, 0.9071848392486572, 0.6162723302841187, 0.7529962062835693, 0.6357124447822571, 0.6685300469398499, 0.8094385266304016, 0.7489303350448608, 0.3312406837940216, 0.5786634683609009, 0.7890816330909729, 0.42565426230430603, 0.5238348841667175, 0.27748289704322815, 0.5380170345306396, 0.5006179809570312, 0.8211820721626282, 0.372275710105896, 0.2850068509578705, 0.8943917751312256, 0.44469934701919556, 0.5070586800575256, 0.8136717677116394, 0.5820398926734924, 0.8280734419822693, 0.8687511086463928, 0.8359754681587219, 0.7555235028266907, 0.8457137942314148, 0.8858104944229126, 0.854580819606781, 0.5610248446464539, 0.8994322419166565, 0.9251216053962708, 0.3259660005569458, 0.39340004324913025, 0.44766175746917725, 0.8619466423988342, 0.8225907683372498, 0.8312295079231262, 0.4309866726398468, 0.9370250701904297, 0.5003508925437927, 0.713145911693573, 0.8664482235908508, 0.6233049035072327, 0.48146215081214905, 0.8294981122016907, 0.8691131472587585, 0.8118810057640076, 0.41048386693000793, 0.8018550276756287, 0.5729377865791321, 0.8130858540534973, 0.44062331318855286, 0.6869098544120789, 0.6068090796470642, 0.8697989583015442, 0.8043479323387146, 0.8606662154197693, 0.4188656508922577, 0.6893317103385925, 0.877713143825531, 0.8095771670341492, 0.8789824843406677, 0.7322186231613159, 0.722247838973999, 0.7965289950370789, 0.5103437304496765, 0.5769010782241821, 0.4504811465740204, 0.7171267867088318, 0.6011837720870972, 0.9593567252159119, 0.9064193964004517, 0.41805633902549744, 0.33799177408218384, 0.6577844023704529, 0.8577976226806641, 0.8081710934638977, 0.9118492603302002, 0.6250758171081543, 0.5803584456443787, 0.9205095171928406, 0.7068201899528503, 0.7412782311439514, 0.8912748694419861, 0.9153223633766174, 0.5901539325714111, 0.9098202586174011, 0.653006911277771, 0.4169124960899353, 0.8407979607582092, 0.62139892578125, 0.7096040844917297, 0.8383773565292358, 0.8917535543441772, 0.4110885262489319, 0.6817396283149719, 0.629142701625824, 0.9086784720420837, 0.6299628615379333, 0.9208215475082397, 0.8046799302101135, 0.42096060514450073, 0.8269165754318237, 0.5382302403450012, 0.4192263185977936, 0.8861098885536194, 0.3300337493419647, 0.9178550839424133, 0.8064652681350708, 0.7099501490592957, 0.5585290789604187, 0.78252774477005, 0.7803307771682739, 0.6876174807548523, 0.8526484966278076, 0.9005467295646667, 0.5348665714263916, 0.9521802663803101, 0.4526251554489136, 0.8458810448646545, 0.916389524936676, 0.8777951598167419, 0.9433110356330872, 0.824783980846405, 0.8897837996482849, 0.3218963146209717, 0.7161799073219299, 0.618488609790802, 0.36628642678260803, 0.6346824765205383, 0.5557305216789246, 0.8534677624702454, 0.8842158317565918, 0.6085697412490845, 0.717231035232544, 0.5249143242835999, 0.4153209328651428, 0.8617570400238037, 0.5647247433662415, 0.866395115852356, 0.3259793817996979, 0.4788081645965576, 0.8689367175102234, 0.8578776717185974, 0.7977492809295654, 0.8786120414733887, 0.7826278805732727, 0.4486554265022278, 0.8247145414352417, 0.4860745370388031, 0.39440152049064636, 0.7082989811897278, 0.828401505947113, 0.8487825393676758, 0.9009680151939392, 0.93905109167099, 0.8860417008399963, 0.8136467933654785, 0.3701605498790741, 0.40582966804504395, 0.5726554989814758, 0.42411869764328003, 0.42187413573265076, 0.6002848744392395, 0.6041547656059265, 0.5540384650230408, 0.9250476360321045, 0.3177785575389862, 0.5069196820259094, 0.8740097880363464]}